Utah statutes.
34-43-103.    Leave of absence -- Request for leave -- Approval by agency.

(1)  An employee of a state agency who is a certified disaster service volunteer may be granted leave from work with pay for an aggregate of up to 15 work days, consecutively or nonconsecutively, in any 12-month period to participate in disaster relief services for the American Red Cross in connection with any disaster, upon the request of the American Red Cross for such employee's services.

(2)  An employee of a state agency requesting leave under this chapter shall file a written request with the employing state agency which includes:

(a)  the anticipated duration of the leave of absence;

(b)  the type of service the employee is to provide on behalf of the American Red Cross;

(c)  the nature and location of the disaster where the employee's services will be provided; and

(d)  a copy of the written request for the employee's services from an official of the American Red Cross.

(3)  Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to require any state agency to grant a public employee's request for voluntary disaster service leave if the employing state agency determines that the grant of leave would pose a hardship on the employing state agency.



Enacted by Chapter 186, 1998 General Session

